Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1237
Prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person who has not been licensed pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act or authorized pursuant to the EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact to hold himself or herself out as an emergency care provider, to use any other term to indicate or imply that he or she is an emergency care provider, or to act as such a provider without a license therefor. It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a training agency for the initial training or renewal or reinstatement of licensure of emergency care providers unless the training agency is approved pursuant to rules and regulations of the department. It shall be unlawful for any person to operate an emergency medical service unless such service is licensed.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 28;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5199;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 521;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 29;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 40.

EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact, see section 38-3801.